Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2914
Investment program; special, limited obligation; treatment.

An obligation of the investment program is a special, limited obligation that is payable solely from the revenue and assets of the investment program and shall not constitute a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State of Nebraska unless expressly authorized by separate statute.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 14.
July 18, 2026